repository/apertium_hn_LC.dix
<e><p><l>o</l><r>a<s n="cat:v"/><s n="gen:m"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="per:m"/><s n="tam:o"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>o</l><r>a<s n="cat:v"/><s n="gen:f"/><s n="num:p"/><s n="per:m"/><s n="tam:o"/></r></p></e>

<e><p><l>o</l><r>a<s n="cat:v"/><s n="gen:m"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="per:a"/><s n="tam:o"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>o</l><r>a<s n="cat:v"/><s n="gen:f"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="per:a"/><s n="tam:o"/></r></p></e>

<e><p><l>Ai</l><r>a<s n="cat:v"/><s n="gen:f"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="per:a"/><s n="tam:Ai"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>Ai</l><r>a<s n="cat:v"/><s n="gen:m"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="per:a"/><s n="tam:Ai"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>Ai</l><r>a<s n="cat:v"/><s n="gen:m"/><s n="num:p"/><s n="per:a"/><s n="tam:Ai"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>Ai</l><r>a<s n="cat:v"/><s n="gen:f"/><s n="num:p"/><s n="per:a"/><s n="tam:Ai"/></r></p></e>
<!-- <e><p><l>Ai</l><r>a<s n="cat:v"/><s n="gen:f"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="per:a"/><s n="tam:Ai"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>Ai</l><r>a<s n="cat:v"/><s n="gen:m"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="per:a"/><s n="tam:Ai"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>Ai</l><r>a<s n="cat:v"/><s n="gen:m"/><s n="num:p"/><s n="per:a"/><s n="tam:Ai"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>Ai</l><r>a<s n="cat:v"/><s n="gen:f"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="per:a"/><s n="tam:Ai"/></r></p></e> -->
</pardef>

<!--

<pardef n="k/ara__v">

-->
<!-- verbal noun -->
<!--
<e><p><l>aranA</l><r>aranA<s n="cat:vn"/><s n="case:d"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>arane</l><r>aranA<s n="cat:vn"/><s n="case:o"/></r></p></e>

 <e><p><l>arawe_hue</l><r>ara<s n="cat:v"/><s n="gen:m"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="per:u"/><s n="tam:adv_we_hue"/></r></p></e>
 <e><p><l>arawe_hue</l><r>ara<s n="cat:v"/><s n="gen:f"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="per:u"/><s n="tam:adv_we_hue"/></r></p></e>
 <e><p><l>arawe_hue</l><r>ara<s n="cat:v"/><s n="gen:m"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="per:m"/><s n="tam:adv_we_hue"/></r></p></e>
 <e><p><l>arawe_hue</l><r>ara<s n="cat:v"/><s n="gen:f"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="per:m"/><s n="tam:adv_we_hue"/></r></p></e>
 <e><p><l>arawe_hue</l><r>ara<s n="cat:v"/><s n="gen:m"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="per:m_h"/><s n="tam:adv_we_hue"/></r></p></e>
 <e><p><l>arawe_hue</l><r>ara<s n="cat:v"/><s n="gen:f"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="per:m_h"/><s n="tam:adv_we_hue"/></r></p></e>
 <e><p><l>arawe_hue</l><r>ara<s n="cat:v"/><s n="gen:m"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="per:a"/><s n="tam:adv_we_hue"/></r></p></e>
 <e><p><l>arawe_hue</l><r>ara<s n="cat:v"/><s n="gen:f"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="per:a"/><s n="tam:adv_we_hue"/></r></p></e>
 <e><p><l>arawe_hue</l><r>ara<s n="cat:v"/><s n="gen:m"/><s n="num:p"/><s n="per:u"/><s n="tam:adv_we_hue"/></r></p></e>
 <e><p><l>arawe_hue</l><r>ara<s n="cat:v"/><s n="gen:f"/><s n="num:p"/><s n="per:u"/><s n="tam:adv_we_hue"/></r></p></e>
 <e><p><l>arawe_hue</l><r>ara<s n="cat:v"/><s n="gen:m"/><s n="num:p"/><s n="per:m"/><s n="tam:adv_we_hue"/></r></p></e>
 <e><p><l>arawe_hue</l><r>ara<s n="cat:v"/><s n="gen:f"/><s n="num:p"/><s n="per:m"/><s n="tam:adv_we_hue"/></r></p></e>
 <e><p><l>arawe_hue</l><r>ara<s n="cat:v"/><s n="gen:m"/><s n="num:p"/><s n="per:m_h"/><s n="tam:adv_we_hue"/></r></p></e>
 <e><p><l>arawe_hue</l><r>ara<s n="cat:v"/><s n="gen:f"/><s n="num:p"/><s n="per:m_h"/><s n="tam:adv_we_hue"/></r></p></e>
 <e><p><l>arawe_hue</l><r>ara<s n="cat:v"/><s n="gen:m"/><s n="num:p"/><s n="per:a"/><s n="tam:adv_we_hue"/></r></p></e>
 <e><p><l>arawe_hue</l><r>ara<s n="cat:v"/><s n="gen:f"/><s n="num:p"/><s n="per:a"/><s n="tam:adv_we_hue"/></r></p></e>


 <e><p><l>arawe_rahanA_hE</l><r>ara<s n="cat:v"/><s n="gen:m"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="per:u"/><s n="tam:we_rahanA_hE"/></r></p></e>
 <e><p><l>arawe_rahanA_hE</l><r>ara<s n="cat:v"/><s n="gen:f"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="per:u"/><s n="tam:we_rahanA_hE"/></r></p></e>
 <e><p><l>arawe_rahanA_hE</l><r>ara<s n="cat:v"/><s n="gen:m"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="per:m"/><s n="tam:we_rahanA_hE"/></r></p></e>
 <e><p><l>arawe_rahanA_hE</l><r>ara<s n="cat:v"/><s n="gen:f"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="per:m"/><s n="tam:we_rahanA_hE"/></r></p></e>
 <e><p><l>arawe_rahanA_hE</l><r>ara<s n="cat:v"/><s n="gen:m"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="per:m_h"/><s n="tam:we_rahanA_hE"/></r></p></e>
 <e><p><l>arawe_rahanA_hE</l><r>ara<s n="cat:v"/><s n="gen:f"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="per:m_h"/><s n="tam:we_rahanA_hE"/></r></p></e>
 <e><p><l>arawe_rahanA_hE</l><r>ara<s n="cat:v"/><s n="gen:m"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="per:a"/><s n="tam:we_rahanA_hE"/></r></p></e>
 <e><p><l>arawe_rahanA_hE</l><r>ara<s n="cat:v"/><s n="gen:f"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="per:a"/><s n="tam:we_rahanA_hE"/></r></p></e>
 <e><p><l>arawe_rahanA_hE</l><r>ara<s n="cat:v"/><s n="gen:m"/><s n="num:p"/><s n="per:u"/><s n="tam:we_rahanA_hE"/></r></p></e>
 <e><p><l>arawe_rahanA_hE</l><r>ara<s n="cat:v"/><s n="gen:f"/><s n="num:p"/><s n="per:u"/><s n="tam:we_rahanA_hE"/></r></p></e>
 <e><p><l>arawe_rahanA_hE</l><r>ara<s n="cat:v"/><s n="gen:m"/><s n="num:p"/><s n="per:m"/><s n="tam:we_rahanA_hE"/></r></p></e>
 <e><p><l>arawe_rahanA_hE</l><r>ara<s n="cat:v"/><s n="gen:f"/><s n="num:p"/><s n="per:m"/><s n="tam:we_rahanA_hE"/></r></p></e>
 <e><p><l>arawe_rahanA_hE</l><r>ara<s n="cat:v"/><s n="gen:m"/><s n="num:p"/><s n="per:m_h"/><s n="tam:we_rahanA_hE"/></r></p></e>
 <e><p><l>arawe_rahanA_hE</l><r>ara<s n="cat:v"/><s n="gen:f"/><s n="num:p"/><s n="per:m_h"/><s n="tam:we_rahanA_hE"/></r></p></e>
 <e><p><l>arawe_rahanA_hE</l><r>ara<s n="cat:v"/><s n="gen:m"/><s n="num:p"/><s n="per:a"/><s n="tam:we_rahanA_hE"/></r></p></e>
 <e><p><l>arawe_rahanA_hE</l><r>ara<s n="cat:v"/><s n="gen:f"/><s n="num:p"/><s n="per:a"/><s n="tam:we_rahanA_hE"/></r></p></e>


<e><p><l>arUz</l><r>ara<s n="cat:v"/><s n="gen:m"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="per:u"/><s n="tam:subj"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>arUz</l><r>ara<s n="cat:v"/><s n="gen:f"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="per:u"/><s n="tam:subj"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>are</l><r>ara<s n="cat:v"/><s n="gen:m"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="per:m"/><s n="tam:subj"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>are</l><r>ara<s n="cat:v"/><s n="gen:f"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="per:m"/><s n="tam:subj"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>arie</l><r>ara<s n="cat:v"/><s n="gen:m"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="per:m_h"/><s n="tam:subj"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>arie</l><r>ara<s n="cat:v"/><s n="gen:f"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="per:m_h"/><s n="tam:subj"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>Ijiye</l><r>ara<s n="cat:v"/><s n="gen:m"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="per:m_h"/><s n="tam:subj"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>Ijiye</l><r>ara<s n="cat:v"/><s n="gen:f"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="per:m_h"/><s n="tam:subj"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>are</l><r>ara<s n="cat:v"/><s n="gen:m"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="per:a"/><s n="tam:subj"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>are</l><r>ara<s n="cat:v"/><s n="gen:f"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="per:a"/><s n="tam:subj"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>areM</l><r>ara<s n="cat:v"/><s n="gen:m"/><s n="num:p"/><s n="per:u"/><s n="tam:subj"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>areM</l><r>ara<s n="cat:v"/><s n="gen:f"/><s n="num:p"/><s n="per:u"/><s n="tam:subj"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>aro</l><r>ara<s n="cat:v"/><s n="gen:m"/><s n="num:p"/><s n="per:m"/><s n="tam:subj"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>aro</l><r>ara<s n="cat:v"/><s n="gen:f"/><s n="num:p"/><s n="per:m"/><s n="tam:subj"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>areM</l><r>ara<s n="cat:v"/><s n="gen:m"/><s n="num:p"/><s n="per:m_h"/><s n="tam:subj"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>areM</l><r>ara<s n="cat:v"/><s n="gen:f"/><s n="num:p"/><s n="per:m_h"/><s n="tam:subj"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>arie</l><r>ara<s n="cat:v"/><s n="gen:m"/><s n="num:p"/><s n="per:a"/><s n="tam:subj"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>arie</l><r>ara<s n="cat:v"/><s n="gen:f"/><s n="num:p"/><s n="per:a"/><s n="tam:subj"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>Ijiye</l><r>ara<s n="cat:v"/><s n="gen:m"/><s n="num:p"/><s n="per:a"/><s n="tam:subj"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>Ijiye</l><r>ara<s n="cat:v"/><s n="gen:f"/><s n="num:p"/><s n="per:a"/><s n="tam:subj"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

-->

<e lm="kara"><i>k</i><par n="k/ara__v"/></e>
